Wisconsin, session 2025, SB530.
do enact as follows:SB530,13Section 1. 59.52 (25) of the statutes is amended to read:SB530,2,6459.52 (25) Advisory and contingent referenda. The board may conduct a 1countywide referendum for advisory purposes or for the purpose of ratifying or 2validating a resolution adopted or ordinance enacted by the board contingent upon 3approval in the referendum. The board may not conduct a referendum for advisory 4purposes, except as provided under s. 66.0305 (6) or for an advisory referendum 5regarding capital expenditures proposed to be funded by the county property tax 6levy.SB530,27Section 2. 66.0144 of the statutes is repealed.SB530,2,88